Illinois, session 104th, HB3299.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 10-8 and by adding Section 10-8.5 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/10-8)  (from Ch. 46, par. 10-8)7    Sec. 10-8. Except as otherwise provided in this Code, 8certificates of nomination and nomination papers, and 9petitions to submit public questions to a referendum, being 10filed as required by this Code, and being in apparent 11conformity with the provisions of this Act, shall be deemed to 12be valid unless objection thereto is duly made in writing 13within 5 business days after the last day for filing the 14certificate of nomination or nomination papers or petition for 15a public question, with the following exceptions:16        A. In the case of petitions to amend Article IV of the 17    Constitution of the State of Illinois, there shall be a 18    period of 35 business days after the last day for the 19    filing of such petitions in which objections can be filed.20        B. In the case of petitions for advisory questions of 21    public policy to be submitted to the voters of the entire 22    State, there shall be a period of 35 business days after 23    the last day for the filing of such petitions in which   HB3299- 2 -LRB104 11000 SPS 21082 b1    objections can be filed.2    Any legal voter of the political subdivision or district 3in which the candidate or public question is to be voted on, or 4any legal voter in the State in the case of a proposed 5amendment to Article IV of the Constitution or an advisory 6public question to be submitted to the voters of the entire 7State, having objections to any certificate of nomination or 8nomination papers or petitions filed, shall file an objector's 9petition together with 2 copies thereof in the principal 10office or the permanent branch office of the State Board of 11Elections, or in the office of the election authority or local 12election official with whom the certificate of nomination, 13nomination papers or petitions are on file. Objection 14petitions that do not include 2 copies thereof, shall not be 15accepted. In the case of nomination papers or certificates of 16nomination, the State Board of Elections, election authority 17or local election official shall note the day and hour upon 18which such objector's petition is filed, and shall, not later 19than 12:00 noon on the second business day after receipt of the 20petition, transmit by registered mail or receipted personal 21delivery, or by electronic delivery under Section 10-8.5, the 22certificate of nomination or nomination papers and the 23original objector's petition to the chair of the proper 24electoral board designated in Section 10-9 hereof, or his 25authorized agent, and shall transmit a copy by registered mail 26or receipted personal delivery, or by electronic delivery   HB3299- 3 -LRB104 11000 SPS 21082 b1under Section 10-8.5, of the objector's petition, to the 2candidate whose certificate of nomination or nomination papers 3are objected to, addressed to the place of residence 4designated in said certificate of nomination or nomination 5papers. In the case of objections to a petition for a proposed 6amendment to Article IV of the Constitution or for an advisory 7public question to be submitted to the voters of the entire 8State, the State Board of Elections shall note the day and hour 9upon which such objector's petition is filed and shall 10transmit a copy of the objector's petition by registered mail 11or receipted personal delivery, or by electronic delivery 12under Section 10-8.5, to the person designated on a 13certificate attached to the petition as the principal 14proponent of such proposed amendment or public question, or as 15the proponents' attorney, for the purpose of receiving notice 16of objections. In the case of objections to a petition for a 17public question, to be submitted to the voters of a political 18subdivision, or district thereof, the election authority or 19local election official with whom such petition is filed shall 20note the day and hour upon which such objector's petition was 21filed, and shall, not later than 12:00 noon on the second 22business day after receipt of the petition, transmit by 23registered mail or receipted personal delivery, or by 24electronic delivery under Section 10-8.5, the petition for the 25public question and the original objector's petition to the 26chair of the proper electoral board designated in Section 10-9   HB3299- 4 -LRB104 11000 SPS 21082 b1hereof, or his authorized agent, and shall transmit a copy by 2registered mail or receipted personal delivery, or by 3electronic delivery under Section 10-8.5, of the objector's 4petition to the person designated on a certificate attached to 5the petition as the principal proponent of the public 6question, or as the proponent's attorney, for the purposes of 7receiving notice of objections.8    The objector's petition shall give the objector's name and 9residence address, and shall state fully the nature of the 10objections to the certificate of nomination or nomination 11papers or petitions in question, and shall state the interest 12of the objector and shall state what relief is requested of the 13electoral board.14    The provisions of this Section and of Sections 10-9, 10-10 15and 10-10.1 shall also apply to and govern objections to 16petitions for nomination filed under Article 7 or Article 8, 17except as otherwise provided in Section 7-13 for cases to 18which it is applicable, and also apply to and govern petitions 19for the submission of public questions under Article 28.20(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 21    (10 ILCS 5/10-8.5 new)22    Sec. 10-8.5. Electronic service of objections. Election 23authorities may authorize service of objections to candidate 24nominations through electronic mail in lieu of personal 25service if the election authority responsible for convening   HB3299- 5 -LRB104 11000 SPS 21082 b1the electoral board: (1) requires candidates to provide an 2electronic mail address where notices of objections and 3electoral board proceedings may be sent electronically in lieu 4of personal service; (2) requires objectors to provide an 5electronic mail address where notices and electoral board 6proceedings may be sent electronically in lieu of personal 7service; and (3) publishes notice of its decision to use this 8Section on its website within 5 business days of the effective 9date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.